Florida, session 2026, SB882.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (12) of section 13 1009.26, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 14 1009.26âFee waivers.â 15 (12)(a)âA state university, a Florida College System 16 institution, a career center operated by a school district under 17 s. 1001.44, or a charter technical career center shall waive 18 out-of-state fees for students, including, but not limited to, 19 students who are undocumented for federal immigration purposes, 20 who are citizens of the United States or lawfully present in the 21 United States who meet the following conditions: 22 1.âAttended a secondary school in this state for 3 23 consecutive years immediately before graduating from a high 24 school in this state; 25 2.âApply for enrollment in an institution of higher 26 education within 24 months after high school graduation; and 27 3.âSubmit an official Florida high school transcript as 28 evidence of attendance and graduation. 29 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.